lib/dict/et_EE.aff
SFX c nud duimatelt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimateltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimateni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimates [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimateski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimateta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimatki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duimgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duina [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duinagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duini [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duinigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duis [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duiski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duisse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duissegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duist [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duistki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duita [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duitagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duke [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukene [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukenegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukese [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesed [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesedki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesegagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeseks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeselegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeselgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeselt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeseltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeseni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeses [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeseski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeseta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesiga [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesigagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesiks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesikski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesil [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesile [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesilegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesilgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesilt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesiltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesina [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesinagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesini [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesinigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesis [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesiski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesisse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesissegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesist [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesistki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesita [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesitagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukeste [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestegagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesteks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestelegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestelgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestelt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesteltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesteni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestes [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesteski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukesteta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dukski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dul [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dule [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dulegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dulgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dult [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dultki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dum [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duma [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumad [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumadki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaga [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumagagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumagi [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaid [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaidki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaiga [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaigagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaiks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaikski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumail [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaile [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumailegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumailgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumailt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumailtki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaina [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumainagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaini [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumainigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumais [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaiski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaisse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaissegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaist [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaistki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaita [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaitagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaks [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumakski [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumal [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumale [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumalegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumalgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumalt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumana [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumanagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumani [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumanigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumas [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumaski [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumasse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumassegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumast [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumastki [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumat [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumata [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatagi [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumate [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumategagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumategi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumateks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatelegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatelgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatelt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumateltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumateni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumates [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumateski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumateta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumatki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dumgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duna [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dunagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dunigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dus [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud duse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dused [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusedki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusegagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseid [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseidki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseiga [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseigagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseiks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseikski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseil [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseile [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseilegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseilgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseilt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseiltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseina [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseinagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseini [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseinigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseis [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseiski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseisse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseissegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseist [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseistki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseita [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseitagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duselegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duselgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duselt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duses [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duseta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusiga [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusigagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusiks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusikski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusil [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusile [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusilegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusilgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusilt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusiltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusina [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusinagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusini [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusinigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusis [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusiski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusisse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusissegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusist [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusistki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusita [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusitagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duski [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dussegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dust [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duste [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustegagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusteks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustelegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustelgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustelt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusteltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusteni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustes [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusteski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusteta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dusti [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dustki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dut [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dute [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutega [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutegagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duteks [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutekski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutel [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutele [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutelegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutelgi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutelt [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duteltki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutena [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutenagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duteni [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutenigi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutes [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duteski [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutesse [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutessegi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutest [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutestki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duteta [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutetagi [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud dutki [lnoräöü]nud
SFX c nud duvat [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud duvatki [loräöü]nud
SFX c nud e knud
SFX c nud egi knud
SFX c nud em knud
SFX c nud emgi knud
SFX c nud es [dü]nud
SFX c nud eski [dü]nud
SFX c nud eta pnud
SFX c nud etagi pnud
SFX c nud etagu pnud
SFX c nud etagugi pnud
SFX c nud etaks pnud
SFX c nud etakse pnud
SFX c nud etaksegi pnud
SFX c nud etakski pnud
SFX c nud etama pnud
SFX c nud etamagi pnud
SFX c nud etamatu pnud
SFX c nud etamatud pnud
SFX c nud etamatudki pnud
SFX c nud etamatuga pnud
SFX c nud etamatugagi pnud
SFX c nud etamatugi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuid pnud
SFX c nud etamatuidki pnud
SFX c nud etamatuiga pnud
SFX c nud etamatuigagi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuiks pnud
SFX c nud etamatuikski pnud
SFX c nud etamatuil pnud
SFX c nud etamatuile pnud
SFX c nud etamatuilegi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuilgi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuilt pnud
SFX c nud etamatuiltki pnud
SFX c nud etamatuina pnud
SFX c nud etamatuinagi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuini pnud
SFX c nud etamatuinigi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuis pnud
SFX c nud etamatuiski pnud
SFX c nud etamatuisse pnud
SFX c nud etamatuissegi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuist pnud
SFX c nud etamatuistki pnud
SFX c nud etamatuita pnud
SFX c nud etamatuitagi pnud
SFX c nud etamatuks pnud
SFX c nud etamatukski pnud
SFX c nud etamatul pnud
SFX c nud etamatule pnud
SFX c nud etamatulegi pnud
SFX c nud etamatulgi pnud
SFX c nud etamatult pnud
SFX c nud etamatultki pnud
SFX c nud etamatuna pnud
SFX c nud etamatunagi pnud
